Oklahoma, session 2025, SB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1423 Page 1


As used in this act:


1. “Government” means this state and its political


subdivisions;


2. “Lawful occupation” means a course of conduct, pursuit, or


profession that includes the sale of goods or services that is not


itself illegal irrespective of an occupational regulation;


3. “Occupational regulation” means a statute, ordinance, rule,


or other requirement in law that requires an individual to possess


certain personal qualifications to work in a lawful occupation;


4. “Qualifications” means criteria related to an individual’s


personal background that may include completion of an approved


educational program, satisfactory performance on an examination,


work experience, criminal history, moral standing, completion of


continuing education, a standard of ethical behavior, or other


criteria as determined by a private certifying organization to


qualify the individual to perform a service to an acceptable


standard as determined by the private certifying organization;


5. “Private certification” means a nontransferable recognition


by a private certifying organization that an individual meets


qualifications determined by the private certifying organization;


6. “Private certifying organization” means a nongovernmental


organization that allows any individual to apply for private


certification regardless of the individual’s race, creed, color,



Req. No. 1423 Page 2


ethnicity, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, or


marital status;


7. “Participating private certifying organization” means a


private certifying organization that registers and otherwise meets


the criteria specified in subsection C of Section 2 of this act; and


8. “Privately certified” is a designated title that an


individual may use if the individual is certified by a participating


private certifying organization.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160.1 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A private certifying organization may voluntarily


participate and register with the government under this section.


B. To participate, a private certifying organization shall


register with the Secretary of State. It shall provide the


Secretary with the organization’s name, address, officers, and the


names of individuals initially privately certified. The Secretary


may impose a registration fee to recoup its costs and promulgate


rules and forms to facilitate registration.


C. A participating private certifying organization shall:


1. Publish on a publicly accessible website all of the


following:


a. the scope of practice of each lawful occupation that


the organization certifies,

Req. No. 1423 Page 3


b. the qualifications that an individual must possess to


become certified by the private certifying


organization,


c. other factors the private certifying organization uses


to certify individuals, which may include consumer


comments, rankings, and other consumer-initiated


elements,


d. the names, business addresses, and websites of all


individuals privately certified by the organization,


and


e. the state in which the private certifying organization


is registered;


2. Require qualifications that are related to the lawful


occupation for which an individual is certified;


3. Verify an individual’s qualifications before certification


and annually verify that the certified individual remains eligible


for certification;


4. Require a privately certified individual to prominently


display the private certification and make available material about


the qualification and other factors required for the private


certification on request; and


5. Have at least fifty privately certified individuals in


active practice in the United States after one (1) year of applying


for registration with the Secretary.

Req. No. 1423 Page 4


D. A participating private certifying organization may require


individuals it certifies to obtain and maintain a bond for liability


that is related to the practice of the individual’s privately


certified lawful occupation.


E. A participating private certifying organization may require


a privately certified individual to pay initial and ongoing fees.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160.2 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual who is certified by a participating private


certifying organization may engage in the lawful occupation for


which that individual is privately certified notwithstanding any


other occupational regulation enacted by the government.


B. The government shall not prohibit or impose a penalty, fine,


or fee on an individual who is certified by a participating private


certifying organization for engaging in a lawful occupation in


compliance with this act.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160.3 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual who is certified by a participating private


certifying organization and who engages in a lawful occupation for


which the government has otherwise enacted an occupation regulation



Req. No. 1423 Page 5


shall prominently display a sign with lettering that is at least one


(1) inch in height stating:


1. The government licenses the service;


2. The individual is not licensed by the government;


3. The individual is privately certified with the name of the


private certifying organization; and


4. The contact information for the private certifying


organization.


B. An individual who is certified by a participating private


certifying organization and who is not licensed, registered, or


certified by the government shall not use the term “licensed”,


“certified”, or “registered” to describe the individual’s credential


or any words, titles, abbreviations, or letters that would induce a


reasonably knowledgeable consumer of such services to believe the


privately certified individual is occupationally regulated by the


government.


C. An individual who is certified by a participating private


certifying organization may use the term “privately certified” to


describe the individual’s credentials or as part of a title or


designation.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160.4 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1423 Page 6


An individual who knowingly and falsely claims to be privately


certified pursuant to this act is guilty of fraud and subject to


penalties under the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4160.5 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Secretary of State shall enforce this act and has the


authority to terminate the government’s registration of the


participating private certifying organization for failure to


continue to meet the requirements of subsection C of Section 2 of


this act.


B. The participating private certifying organization that


continues to operate ninety (90) days after failing to meet the


requirements of subsection C of Section 2 of this act is guilty of


fraud and subject to punishment under the Oklahoma Consumer


Protection Act.


C. Except to the extent that this act requires a privately


certified individual to possess qualifications established by the


government to perform a lawful occupation, this act shall not limit


the government’s authority to enact and enforce laws relating to:


1. A business license or permit, facility license, building


permit, or land use regulation; and


2. Public health, safety, and environmental regulations through


the enforcement of regulations other than occupational licenses

Req. No. 1423 Page 7


including the sale and use of substances that endanger public health


and safety if mishandled or improperly dispensed including


chemicals, explosives, and pharmaceuticals.


D. Nothing in this act shall be construed to:


1. Change the government’s sole authority to require an


individual to obtain and maintain a government-issued driver license


and related insurance for personal or commercial vehicle use;


2. Limit damages in a private civil action against an


individual who is privately certified or who knowingly and falsely


claims to be privately certified;


3. Require a private party or the government to do business


with an individual who is not licensed, certified, or registered


with the government;


4. Create a cause of action against a private party or the


government;


5. Allow for private certification of occupations regulated by


the federal government or required by federal law to be


occupationally licensed by the government;


6. Require a private certifying organization to participate and


register with the government under this act;


7. Increase the authority of the government to regulate


nonparticipating private certifying organizations;





Req. No. 1423 Page 8


8. Require doctors and other medical professionals to obtain


operating room privileges or other credentials from the state,


hospitals, or clinics to perform surgery or an operation; or


9. Reduce the authority of the Supreme Court to regulate who


may issue subpoenas, serve discovery, and litigate cases before


state judges.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1423 CAD 12/31/2024 11:09:06 AM































Req. No. 1423 Page 9